Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 7. Bylaws
§ 4420.
Local Act 250 review of municipal impacts.

This section shall apply to any municipality in which all of the following have taken place, either at the direction of the legislative body or pursuant to a vote of the municipality’s voters at a duly warned municipal meeting considering the question:

The criteria specified in this section have been adopted in the appropriate bylaws authorized under this chapter.

The municipality’s plan has been duly adopted under the provisions of this chapter.

The municipality has adopted zoning bylaws and subdivision bylaws, either separately or incorporated into one unified development bylaw.

The municipality has adopted, for purposes of this section, the Municipal Administrative Procedure Act established in chapter 36 of this title.

A development review board has been created and has been authorized to undertake local Act 250 review of municipal impacts caused by a development or subdivision, or both, as the terms “development” and “subdivision” are defined in 10 V.S.A. chapter 151.

With respect to developments or subdivisions to which this section applies, the development review board, pursuant to the procedures established in chapter 36 of this title, shall hear such applications as meet the criteria set forth in the bylaws with respect to size or impact, or both, for local Act 250 review of municipal impacts. Once a municipality has determined to conduct reviews under this section, all applicants meeting such criteria for Act 250 permits for developments or subdivisions located within the municipality shall go through this process, unless all the following apply:
(b) (1) With respect to developments or subdivisions to which this section applies, the development review board, pursuant to the procedures established in chapter 36 of this title, shall hear such applications as meet the criteria set forth in the bylaws with respect to size or impact, or both, for local Act 250 review of municipal impacts. Once a municipality has determined to conduct reviews under this section, all applicants meeting such criteria for Act 250 permits for developments or subdivisions located within the municipality shall go through this process, unless all the following apply:

The applicant can establish to the satisfaction of the development review board that the applicant relied on a determination by the Natural Resources Board’s local district coordinator that Act 250 jurisdiction did not apply to the development or subdivision in question, and based upon that reliance, the applicant obtained local permits without complying with this section.

The Natural Resources Board’s local district coordinator’s jurisdictional ruling was later reconsidered or overturned on appeal, with the result that Act 250 jurisdiction does apply to the development or subdivision in question.

The development review board waives its jurisdiction under this section in the interest of fairness to the applicant.

Determinations by the development review board regarding whether to waive jurisdiction under this subsection shall not be subject to review.

In proceedings under this section, the applicant shall demonstrate that the proposed development or subdivision:

Will not cause an unreasonable burden on the ability of the municipality to provide educational services.

Will not cause an unreasonable burden on the ability of the municipality to provide municipal or governmental services.

Is in conformance with the plan of the municipality adopted in accordance with this chapter.

A violation of the provisions of this section shall be subject to enforcement as a violation of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 95.

§ 4421.
Official map.

A municipality may adopt an official map that identifies future municipal utility and facility improvements, such as road or recreational path rights-of-way, parkland, utility rights-of-way, and other public improvements, in order to provide the opportunity for the community to acquire land identified for public improvements prior to development for other use and to identify the locations of required public facilities for new subdivisions and other development under review by the municipality.

Preparation of an official map. For the purposes of this chapter, the official map shall be based upon the most accurate data available as to the location and width of existing and proposed streets and drainageways and the location of all existing and proposed parks, schools, and other public facilities. Where questions arise in the administration of this section that require more precise determinations of the location of any street right-of-way line on all drainageways or the location of any park, school, or any other public facility, the legislative body shall have a survey prepared of the street or section, park, school, or other public facility in question, that may by resolution of the legislative body become a part of the official map.

Changes to the official map. After adoption of the official map, the recordation of plats that have been approved as provided by this chapter, or the adoption of any urban renewal plan under chapter 85 of this title, shall, without further action, modify the official map accordingly. Minor changes in the location of proposed public facilities may also be made to particular sections of the official map if the change is recommended by a majority of the planning commission and approved by resolution of the legislative body. This process may take place concurrently with review of development or subdivision of a parcel that is proposed to be subject to a map change.

Status of mapped public facilities. The adoption, as part of an official map, of any existing or proposed street or street line or drainageway, or any proposed park, school, or other public facility, shall not constitute a taking or acceptance of land by the municipality, nor shall the adoption of any street in an official map constitute the opening or establishment of the street for public use or obligate the municipality in any way for the maintenance of the street.

Building on properties with mapped public facilities. No zoning permit may be issued for any land development within the lines of any street, drainageway, park, school, or other public facility shown on the official map, except as specifically provided in this section. No person shall recover any damages for the taking for public use of any land development constructed within the lines of any proposed street, drainageway, park, school, or other public facility after it has been included in the official map, and any such land development shall be removed at the expense of the owner.

If a permit for any land development within the lines of any proposed street, drainageway, park, school, or other public facility shown on an official map is denied pursuant to subdivision (5) of this section, the legislative body shall have 120 days from the date of the denial of the permit to institute proceedings to acquire that land or interest in that land, and if no such proceedings are started within that time, the administrative officer shall issue the permit if the application otherwise conforms to all the applicable bylaws.

A municipality may specify in its bylaws that conditional use review is required for any structure within the line of any public facility shown on the official map or within a specified area adjacent to the lines on the map. If conditional use review is required for these structures, the purpose of the review shall be to ensure that the structure is compatible with the location and function of existing and planned public facilities. If the conditional use is denied, the procedure provided in subdivision (4)(A) of this section shall be instituted.

Development review for properties with mapped public facilities. Any application for subdivision or other development review that involves property on which the official map shows a public facility shall demonstrate that the mapped public facility will be accommodated by the proposed subdivision or development in accordance with the municipality’s bylaws. Failure to accommodate the mapped public facility or obtain a minor change in the official map shall result in the denial of the development or subdivision. The legislative body shall have 120 days from the date of the denial of the permit to institute proceedings to acquire that land or interest in land, and if these proceedings are not started within that time, the appropriate municipal panel shall review the application without regard to the proposed public facilities.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 95.

§ 4422.
Adequate public facilities; phasing.

Development may be phased or limited under a bylaw to avoid or mitigate any undue adverse impact on existing or planned community facilities or services. Where a capital budget and program has been adopted, the bylaw may limit or phase development based on the timing of construction or implementation of related necessary public facilities and services, in conformance with an adopted capital budget and program. A municipality also may levy impact fees in accordance with chapter 131 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 95.

§ 4423.
Transfer of development rights.

In order to accomplish the purposes of

10 V.S.A. § 6301

, bylaws may contain provisions for the transfer of development rights. The bylaws shall do all the following:

Specify one or more sending areas for which development rights may be acquired.

Specify one or more receiving areas in which those development rights may be used.

Define the amount of the density increase allowable in receiving areas, and the quantity of development rights necessary to obtain those increases.

Define “density increase” in terms of an allowable percentage decrease in lot size or increase in building bulk, lot coverage, or ratio of floor area to lot size, or any combination.

Define “development rights,” which at minimum shall include a conservation easement, created by deed for a specified period of not less than 30 years, granted to the municipality under 10 V.S.A. chapter 155, limiting land uses in the sending area solely to specified purposes, but including, at a minimum, agriculture and forestry.

Upon approval by the appropriate municipal panel, a zoning permit may be granted for land development based in part upon a density increase, provided there is compliance with all the following:

The area subject to the application is a receiving area, and the density increase is allowed by the provisions relating to transfer of development rights.

The applicant has obtained development rights from a sending area that are sufficient under the regulations for the density increase sought.

The development rights are evidenced by a deed that recites that it is a conveyance under this subdivision and recites the number of acres affected in the sending area.

The sending area from which development rights have been severed has been surveyed and suitably monumented.

The municipality shall maintain a map of areas from which development rights have been severed. Following issuance of a zoning permit under this section, the municipality shall effect all the following:

Ensure that the instruments transferring the conservation easements and the development rights are recorded.

Mark the development rights map showing the area from which development rights have been severed and indicating the book and page in the land records where the easement is recorded.

Failure to record an instrument or mark a map does not invalidate a transfer of development rights. Development rights transferred under this section shall be valid notwithstanding any subsequent failure to file a notice of claim under the Marketable Record Title Act.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 95.

§ 4424.
Shorelands; river corridor protection areas; flood or hazard area; special or freestanding bylaws.

Bylaws; flood and other hazard areas; river corridor protection. Any municipality may adopt freestanding bylaws under this chapter to address particular hazard areas in conformance with the municipal plan or, for the purpose of adoption of a flood hazard area bylaw, a local hazard mitigation plan approved under 44 C.F.R. § 201.6. Such freestanding bylaws may include the following, which may also be part of zoning or unified development bylaws:

Bylaws to regulate development and use along shorelands.

Bylaws to regulate development and use in flood areas, river corridor protection areas, or other hazard areas. The following shall apply if flood or other hazard area bylaws are enacted:

Purposes.

To minimize and prevent the loss of life and property, the disruption of commerce, the impairment of the tax base, and the extraordinary public expenditures and demands on public service that result from flooding, landslides, erosion hazards, earthquakes, and other natural or human-made hazards.

To ensure that the design and construction of development in flood, river corridor protection, and other hazard areas are accomplished in a manner that minimizes or eliminates the potential for flood and loss or damage to life and property in a flood hazard area or that minimizes the potential for fluvial erosion and loss or damage to life and property in a river corridor protection area.

To manage all flood hazard areas designated pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 753

.

To make the State and municipalities eligible for federal flood insurance and other federal disaster recovery and hazard mitigation funds as may be available.

Contents of bylaws. Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, flood, river corridor protection area, and other hazard area bylaws may:

Contain standards and criteria that prohibit the placement of damaging obstructions or structures, the use and storage of hazardous or radioactive materials, and practices that are known to further exacerbate hazardous or unstable natural conditions.

Require flood, fluvial erosion, and hazard protection through elevation, floodproofing, disaster preparedness, hazard mitigation, relocation, or other techniques.

Require adequate provisions for flood drainage and other emergency measures.

Require provision of adequate and disaster-resistant water and wastewater facilities.

Establish other restrictions to promote the sound management and use of designated flood, river corridor protection, and other hazard areas.

Regulate all land development in a flood hazard area, river corridor protection area, or other hazard area, except for development that is regulated under

10 V.S.A. § 754

.

Effect on zoning bylaws. Flood or other hazard area bylaws may alter the uses otherwise permitted, prohibited, or conditional in a flood or other hazard area under a bylaw, as well as the applicability of other provisions of that bylaw. Where a flood hazard bylaw, a hazard area bylaw, or both apply along with any other bylaw, compliance with the flood or other hazard area bylaw shall be prerequisite to the granting of a zoning permit. Where a flood hazard area bylaw or a hazard area bylaw but not a zoning bylaw applies, the flood hazard and other hazard area bylaw shall be administered in the same manner as are zoning bylaws, and a flood hazard area or hazard area permit shall be required for land development covered under the bylaw.

Mandatory provisions. Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, all flood and other hazard area bylaws shall provide that no permit for new construction or substantial improvement shall be granted for a flood or other hazard area until after both the following:
(D) (i) Mandatory provisions. Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, all flood and other hazard area bylaws shall provide that no permit for new construction or substantial improvement shall be granted for a flood or other hazard area until after both the following:

A copy of the application is mailed or delivered by the administrative officer or by the appropriate municipal panel to the Agency of Natural Resources or its designee, which may be done electronically, provided the sender has proof of receipt.

Either 30 days have elapsed following the mailing or the Agency or its designee delivers comments on the application.

The Agency of Natural Resources may delegate to a qualified representative of a municipality with a flood hazard area bylaw or ordinance or to a qualified representative for a regional planning commission the Agency’s authority under this subdivision (a)(2)(D) to review and provide technical comments on a proposed permit for new construction or substantial improvement in a flood hazard area. Comments provided by a representative delegated under this subdivision (a)(2)(D) shall not be binding on a municipality.

Ordinances. A municipality may adopt a flood hazard area, river corridor protection area, or other hazard area regulation that meets the requirements of this section by ordinance under subdivision 2291(25) of this title.

Permit; planting projects.

As used in this subsection, “planting project” means planting vegetation to restore natural and beneficial floodplain functions, as defined in

42 U.S.C. § 4121(a)

, that include floodwater storage, water quality improvement, and supporting riparian and aquatic habitat.

By operation of this subsection, a planting project in a flood or other hazard area or river corridor protection area is considered to have a permit under this chapter unless the project is:

part of a larger undertaking that includes the construction or installation of structures, the creation of earthen berms or banks, or physical disturbance of land or water other than necessary for planting vegetation; or

a forestry operation or part of a forestry operation as defined in

10 V.S.A. § 2602

and exempt from municipal regulation under subsection 4413(d) of this title.

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of this chapter or municipal bylaw or ordinance, a planting project considered to have a permit by operation of this subsection shall not be required to file an application to obtain a permit under this chapter or approval under a municipal ordinance or to obtain the issuance of such a permit or approval by the municipality.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 95; amended by

2011, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. May 14, 2012;

2013, No. 34

, § 15;

2017, No. 4

, § 1, eff. March 6, 2017;

2017, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 16.

§§ 4425,
4426.
Repealed. 2003, No. 115 (Adj. Sess.), § 119(c).

§ 4427.
Persons eligible to apply for permits.

Municipalities and solid waste management districts empowered to condemn property or an interest in property may apply for any permit required by any zoning regulation adopted under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 109

, § 5, eff. June 28, 1991.